Idaho, session 2026, H0695.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 6-310A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-310A. LIMITED ALTERNATIVE REMEDY TO REMOVE UNAUTHORIZED PERSONS
FROM RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY. (1) The legislature finds that the right
to exclude others from entering, and the right to direct others to immedi-
ately vacate, residential real property are the most important real property
rights. The legislature further finds that existing remedies regarding
unauthorized persons who unlawfully remain on residential real property
fail to adequately protect the rights of the property owner and fail to ad-
equately discourage theft and vandalism. The intent of this section is to
quickly restore possession of residential real property to the lawful owner
of the property when the property is being unlawfully occupied and to thereby
preserve property rights while limiting the opportunity for criminal activ-
ity.
(2) A property owner or the owner's authorized agent may request from
the sheriff of the county in which the property is located the immediate
removal of a person or persons unlawfully occupying a residential dwelling
pursuant to this section if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The requesting person is the property owner or authorized agent of
the property owner;
(b) The real property that is being occupied includes a residential
dwelling;
(c) An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully entered and re-
main or continue to reside on the property owner's property;
(d) The real property was not open to members of the public at the time
the unauthorized person or persons entered;
(e) The property owner has directed the unauthorized person to leave
the property;
(f) The unauthorized person or persons are not current or former ten-
ants pursuant to a written or oral rental agreement authorized by the
property owner;
(g) The unauthorized person or persons are not immediate family members
of the property owner; and
(h) There is no pending litigation related to the real property between
the property owner and any known unauthorized person.
(3) To request the immediate removal of an unlawful occupant of a res-
idential dwelling, the property owner or the owner's authorized agent must


submit a complaint by presenting a completed and verified "Complaint to Re-
move Persons Unlawfully Occupying Residential Real Property" to the sheriff
of the county in which the real property is located. The submitted complaint
must be in substantially the following form:
COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY OCCUPYING
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real property
located at......, declare under the penalty of perjury that (ini-
tial each box):
1..... I am the owner of the real property or the authorized agent
of the owner of the real property.
2..... I purchased the property on.....
3..... The real property is a residential dwelling.
4..... An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully entered
and are remaining or residing unlawfully on the real property.
5..... The real property was not open to members of the public at
the time the unauthorized person or persons entered.
6..... I have directed the unauthorized person or persons to leave
the real property, but they have not done so.
7..... The person or persons are not current or former tenants pur-
suant to any valid lease authorized by the property owner, and any
lease that may be produced by an occupant is fraudulent.
8..... The unauthorized person or persons sought to be removed are
not owners or co-owners of the property and have not been listed on
the title to the property unless the person or persons have engaged
in title fraud.
9..... The unauthorized person or persons are not immediate family
members of the property owner.
10..... There is no litigation related to the real property pending
between the property owner and any person sought to be removed.
11..... I understand that a person or persons removed from the
property pursuant to this procedure may bring a cause of action
against me for any false statements made in this complaint, or for
wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a result of such action
I may be held liable for actual damages, penalties, costs, and rea-
sonable attorney's fees.
12..... I am requesting the sheriff to immediately remove the unau-
thorized person or persons from the residential property.
13..... A copy of my valid government-issued identification is at-
tached, or I am an agent of the property owner, and documents evi-
dencing my authority to act on the property owner's behalf are at-
tached.
I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS PETITION AND EACH STATEMENT
IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN THIS
PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY.
...(Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Owner)...
(4) Upon receipt of the complaint, the sheriff shall verify that the
person submitting the complaint is the record owner of the real property or
the authorized agent of the owner and appears otherwise entitled to relief
pursuant to the provisions of this section. If verified, the sheriff shall,


without delay, serve a notice to immediately vacate on all the unlawful occu-
pants and shall put the owner in possession of the real property. Service may
be accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to an occupant or by posting
the notice on the front door or entrance of the dwelling. The sheriff shall
also attempt to verify the identities of all persons occupying the dwelling
and note the identities on the return of service. If appropriate, the sher-
iff may arrest any person found in the dwelling for trespass, outstanding
warrants, or any other legal cause.
(5) The sheriff is entitled to the same fee for service of the notice
to immediately vacate as if the sheriff were serving a writ of possession
restitution. After the sheriff serves the notice to immediately vacate, the
property owner or authorized agent may request that the sheriff stand by to
keep the peace while the property owner or agent of the owner changes the
locks and removes the personal property of the unlawful occupants from the
premises to or near the property line. When such a request is made, the sher-
iff may charge a reasonable hourly rate, and the person requesting the sher-
iff to stand by and keep the peace is responsible for paying the reasonable
hourly rate set by the sheriff. The sheriff is not liable to the unlawful oc-
cupant or any other party for loss, destruction, or damage of property. The
property owner or the owner's authorized agent is not liable to an unlawful
occupant or any other party for the loss, destruction, or damage to the per-
sonal property unless the removal was wrongful.
(6) A person may bring a civil cause of action for wrongful removal un-
der this section. A person harmed by a wrongful removal under this section
may be restored to possession of the real property and may recover actual
costs and damages incurred, statutory damages equal to triple the fair mar-
ket rent of the dwelling, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees. The
court shall advance the cause on the calendar.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not limit the rights of a prop-
erty owner or limit the authority of a law enforcement officer to arrest an
unlawful occupant for trespassing, vandalism, theft, or other crimes.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.